Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.835

Exceptional faculty awards—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that quality in the state's community and technical colleges would be strengthened by additional partnerships between citizens and the institutions. The legislature intends to foster these partnerships by creating a matching grant program to assist public community and technical colleges in creating endowments for funding exceptional faculty awards.

[ 1991 c 238 s 62; 1990 c 29 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 29: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1990 c 29 s 8.]